Maryland, session 2026, SB0075.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
4–205.
(a) This section does not apply to:
(1) an establishment that already holds a Class A, Class B, or Class D beer
license, beer and wine license, or beer, wine, and liquor license; or
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0075*

SENATE BILL 75
(2) a license holder that sells alcoholic beverages at discount prices.
(b) [A] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 4–205.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE, A local
licensing board may not issue a Class A, Class B, or Class D beer license, beer and wine
license, or beer, wine, and liquor license for use in conjunction with or on the premises of:
(1) a chain store;
(2) a supermarket; or
(3) a discount house.
4–205.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “FAIR MARKET VALUE” MEANS THE PRICE AT WHICH A CLASS A
LICENSE WOULD CHANGE HANDS BETWEEN A WILLING LICENSE HOLDER AND A
WILLING FOOD RETAILER WHEN:
(I) NEITHER PARTY IS ACTING UNDER COMPULSION; AND
(II) BOTH PARTIES HAVE KNOWLEDGE OF ALL OF THE
RELEVANT FACTS.
(3) “FOOD RETAILER” MEANS A RETAIL ESTABLISHMENT THAT:
(I) OFFERS FOR SALE FOOD PRODUCTS IN AT LEAST FIVE OF
THE FOLLOWING CATEGORIES:
1. FRESH FRUITS AND VEGETABLES;
2. FRESH AND UNCOOKED MEAT, POULTRY, AND
SEAFOOD;
3. DAIRY PRODUCTS;
4. CANNED FOODS;
5. FROZEN FOODS; AND
6. DRY GROCERIES AND BAKED GOODS;

SENATE BILL 75 3
(II) ACCEPTS SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION ASSISTANCE
PROGRAM CREDITS AS PAYMENT FOR FOOD AND BEVERAGES;
(III) HAS A MINIMUM OF 3,200 SQUARE FEET; AND
(IV) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN DIVISION II OF THIS ARTICLE, HAS
A PRIMARY ENTRANCEWAY THAT IS AT LEAST:
1. 300 FEET FROM THE NEAREST POINT OF A PLACE OF
WORSHIP OR SCHOOL; AND
2. 100 FEET FROM ANY RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY NOT
LOCATED IN THE SAME BUILDING OR STRUCTURE AS THE FOOD RETAILER.
(B) (1) A FOOD RETAILER LOCATED LESS THAN 3,000 FEET FROM A
CLASS A LICENSE HOLDER MAY OFFER TO PURCHASE THE CLASS A LICENSE FROM
THE LICENSE HOLDER AT FAIR MARKET VALUE.
(2) A FOOD RETAILER THAT OBTAINS A LICENSE IN ACCORDANCE
WITH PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION MAY SELL ONLY BEER OR BEER AND
WINE UNDER THE LICENSE, REGARDLESS OF THE TYPE OF CLASS A LICENSE THAT
WAS PURCHASED.
(3) DEPENDING ON THE TYPES OF LICENSES AVAILABLE IN THE
JURISDICTION, THE LOCAL LICENSING BOARD SHALL ISSUE TO THE FOOD RETAILER
THAT OBTAINS A CLASS A LICENSE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION:
(I) A CLASS A BEER LICENSE;
(II) A CLASS A BEER AND WINE LICENSE; OR
(III) A CLASS A BEER AND LIGHT WINE LICENSE.
(C) IF A LICENSE HOLDER DOES NOT ACCEPT A FOOD RETAILER’S OFFER,
THE FOOD RETAILER MAY APPLY TO A LOCAL LICENSING BOARD FOR A CLASS A
BEER OR BEER AND WINE LICENSE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE LOCAL LICENSING
BOARD’S RULES.
(D) (1) IF A LICENSE HOLDER ASSERTS THAT A FOOD RETAILER’S OFFER
WAS NOT AT FAIR MARKET VALUE, THE LICENSE HOLDER SHALL HAVE STANDING TO
SEEK JUDICIAL REVIEW.

SENATE BILL 75
(2) WHEN DETERMINING WHETHER A FOOD RETAILER’S OFFER TO
PURCHASE A CLASS A LICENSE IS AT FAIR MARKET VALUE, THE FACT THAT A FOOD
RETAILER MAY NOT RECEIVE THE FULL BENEFIT OF THE LICENSE SHALL BE TAKEN
INTO ACCOUNT.
(3) AN APPLICATION FOR A CLASS A LICENSE IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION SHALL BE STAYED PENDING A FINAL JUDICIAL
DETERMINATION.
(E) AN APPLICATION FOR A CLASS A BEER OR BEER AND WINE LICENSE
MADE BY A FOOD RETAILER:
(1) IS PRESUMED TO BE IN THE BEST INTEREST OF THE COMMUNITY;
AND
(2) MAY NOT BE DENIED FOR ANY REASON OTHER THAN A REASON
TRADITIONALLY CONSIDERED BY A LOCAL LICENSING BOARD.
4–303.
[A] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 4–205.1 OF THIS TITLE, A Class A, Class B, or
Class D beer license, beer and wine license, or beer, wine, and liquor license may not be
transferred for use in conjunction with or on the premises of a chain store, supermarket, or
discount house unless:
(1) the establishment already holds a Class A, Class B, or Class D beer
license, beer and wine license, or beer, wine, and liquor license; or
(2) the license is transferred to a similar type of establishment.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.